Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 2. Establishment and Organization

§ 4571.
Establishment.

There is hereby established a body corporate and politic, with corporate succession, to be known as the “Vermont Municipal Bond Bank.” The Bank is hereby constituted as an instrumentality exercising public and essential governmental functions, and the exercise by the Bank of the powers conferred by this chapter are deemed to be an essential governmental function of the State.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4571a.
Reports.

The Vermont Municipal Bond Bank shall prepare and submit, consistent with

2 V.S.A. § 20(a)

, a report on activities for the preceding calendar year, pursuant to section 4594 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 294i.

§ 4572.
Membership; vacancies.

The Bank established by section 4571 of this title shall consist of the following five directors: the State Treasurer, or his or her designee, who shall be a director ex officio, and four directors appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate for terms of two years. The four directors appointed by the Governor must be residents of the State and must be qualified voters therein for at least one year next preceding the time of appointment. The Governor shall first appoint two directors to serve until February 1, 1971 and two directors to serve until February 1, 1972. Each director shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until his or her successor shall have been appointed and qualified. A director shall be eligible for reappointment. Any vacancy in a directorship occurring other than by expiration of term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, except that the advice and consent of the Senate shall not be required if it is not in session, but for the unexpired term only.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970;

2011, No. 40

, § 52, eff. May 20, 2011.

§ 4573.
Removal from office; oath.

Each director may be removed from office by the Governor, for cause, after a public hearing, and may be suspended by the Governor pending the completion of the hearing.
Each director before entering upon his or her duties shall take and subscribe an oath to perform the duties of his or her office faithfully, impartially, and justly to the best of his or her ability.
A record of the oath shall be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4574.
Officers; quorum.

The directors shall elect one of their number as chair. The directors shall elect a secretary and a treasurer who need not be directors, and the same person may be elected to serve both as secretary and treasurer.
The powers of the Bank are vested in the directors thereof and three directors of the Bank shall constitute a quorum.
Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the Bank at any meeting thereof by the affirmative vote of at least three directors of the Bank.
A vacancy in the directorship of the Bank shall not impair the right of a quorum to exercise all the powers and perform all the duties of the Bank.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1971, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 14, 1972.

§ 4575.
Bonding of members.

Before the issuance of any bonds or notes under this chapter, each director of the Bank shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of $25,000.00 and the treasurer of the Bank shall execute a surety bond in the penal sum of $50,000.00.
Each surety bond shall be conditioned upon the faithful performance of the duties of the office of the director or treasurer, to be executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in the State of Vermont as surety and to be approved by the Attorney General and filed in the office of the Secretary of State.
After the issuance of any bonds or notes by the Bank each director of the Bank shall maintain his or her surety bond in force.
All costs of the surety bonds shall be borne by the Bank.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.

§ 4576.
Compensation; expenses.

The directors of the Bank shall receive a per diem compensation in the amount of $30.00 for each day devoted to official duties and reimbursement for actual expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their duties. Notwithstanding any other law, an officer or employee of the State shall not be deemed to forfeit his or her office or employment or any benefits thereof by reason of his or her acceptance of the office of director of the Bank.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970; amended

1979, No. 59

, § 18, eff. July 1, 1979.

§ 4577.
Staff.

The Bank may employ such officers, agents, and employees as it may require and determine their qualifications, terms of office, duties, and compensation all without regard to 3 V.S.A. chapter 13.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 216

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 27, 1970.